LEGO.com
Legal
Notices & Policies
Privacy Policy
Last Modified: February 8, 2024
IMPORTANT ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
SECTION 1: DATA PRIVACY LAW AND YOUR DIGITAL RIGHTS
What is this Policy all about?
Welcome to our Privacy Policy! It’s great that you’d like to know more about how we keep your information safe. This policy will give you information about how we look after your personal data when you visit or use our services or our applications (apps). The Privacy Policy also tells you about your privacy rights and how the law protects you.  Finally, this Privacy Policy covers both our online and offline data collection activities, including personal data that we may collect through our various channels such as websites, apps, third party social networks, retail stores, points of sales and events.
This is our overall Privacy Policy. For some jurisdictions, additional country/state specific provisions apply. Click here to be directed to the specific provisions.
In other words, if you’re looking for more information on how we collect, store, use and share your personal data, this is the place for you!
Who is responsible for your personal data?
The LEGO Group is made up by several different legal entities spread around the world. You can read more about the LEGO Group here https://www.lego.com/aboutus.
This Privacy Policy is issued on behalf of all the companies in the LEGO Group where LEGO System A/S is the data controller (the one responsible and in charge of the data).  In some circumstances a local LEGO Group entity has identified their own data controller for their local country where local processing is taking place. For the purposes of this Privacy Policy when we use “we”, “us” or “our” in this Policy, we are talking about LEGO System A/S.
We have appointed a data protection officer (“DPO”) who is responsible for overseeing questions in relation to this Privacy Policy. If you have any questions about this Policy, please
contact us
. You can also send a letter to the DPO at:
LEGO System A/S
Aastvej 1,
7190 Billund,
Denmark
Att: DPO
Please include your name and country to which your inquiry relates.
Your privacy rights
As a data subject you have the following rights in respect of the personal data we hold on you:
Request access to your personal data.
You have a right to access the personal data we are keeping about you. In many cases this information is already present to you in your online services from us. Your right to access may, however, be restricted by legislation, protection of other persons’ privacy and consideration for the LEGO Group’s business practices, know-how, business secrets and internal assessments.
Request correction of incorrect or incomplete data.
If the data we have pertaining to you are incorrect or incomplete, you are entitled to have the data corrected, with the restrictions that follow from legislation.
Request erasure
You have the right to request deletion of your data when:
the personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed;
you withdraw your consent to the processing and there is no other legitimate reason for processing;
you object to the processing and there is no justified reason for continuing the processing;
or the processing is unlawful
Please note that, in certain circumstances, we may be required to retain some of your personal data after you have requested deletion to satisfy our legal or contractual obligations. We may also be permitted by applicable laws to retain some of your personal data to satisfy our business needs.
Limitation of processing of personal data.
If you contest the correctness of the data which we have registered about you or lawfulness of processing, or if you have objected to the processing of the data in accordance with your right to object, you may request us to restrict the processing of this data. The processing will be restricted to storage only, until the correctness of the data can be established, or it can be checked whether our legitimate interests override your interests.  Even when processing of your data has been restricted as described above, the LEGO Group may process your data in other ways if this is necessary to enforce a legal claim or to process previously collected data if you have earlier given your consent.
Object to processing based on our legitimate interest.
You can always object to the processing of personal data about you which is based on legitimate interest.  If we are processing your data for direct marketing and profiling in connection to such marketing, your objection will always be sustained.  For objections to processing for other purposes, we will conduct a legitimate interest balancing test and consider whether to support your objection.
Data portability.
You have a right to receive personal data that you have provided to us in a machine-readable format. This right applies to personal data processed only by automated means and on the basis of consent or of fulfilling a contract.
Other rights.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with The Danish Data Protection Agency, if you are dissatisfied with the way we process your personal data. You will find the Danish Data Protection Agency’s contact information at www.datatilsynet.dk.
Further information: updates
If we change the way we handle your personal data, we will update this Privacy Policy. We reserve the right to make changes to our practices and this Privacy Policy at any time, so please check back frequently to see any updates or changes to our Privacy Policy.
SECTION 2: PERSONAL DATA
What personal data does the LEGO Group collect?
Personal data is any information about a person from which that person can be identified.  We may collect, use, store and transfer different kinds of personal data about you which we have grouped together as follows:
Identity Data
includes first name, last name, username or similar unique identifier, marital status, title, date of birth and gender.
Contact Data
includes billing address, delivery address, email address and telephone numbers or similar contact data.
Financial Data
includes bank account and payment card details.
Transaction Data
includes details about payments to and from you and other details of products and services you have purchased from us.
Technical Data
includes internet protocol (IP) address, your login data, browser type and version, time zone setting and location, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system and platform, user ID, MAC ID and other technology on the devices you use to access this website.
Profile Data
includes your username and password.
Purchaser Data
includes purchases or orders made by you, services requested, rewards or benefits requested or used, your interests, preferences, and feedback or survey responses.
Usage Data
includes information about how you use our website, products and services.
Marketing and Communications Data
includes your preferences in receiving marketing from us and our third parties, participate in sweepstakes and other prize competitions and your communication preferences.
Tracking Data
including data about what pages you visited prior to landing on our websites or where you traveled after visiting our website as well as how you interacted with emails or other messages sent to you by us (e.g. if you deleted or opened the email).
We also collect, use and share
Aggregated Data
such as statistical or demographic data for any purpose. Aggregated Data could be derived from your personal data but is not considered personal data because this data will not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. For example, we may aggregate your Usage Data to calculate the percentage of users accessing a specific website feature. However, if we combine or connect Aggregated Data with your personal data so that it can directly or indirectly identify you, we treat the combined data as personal data which will be used in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
We use
Pseudonymized Data
in order to minimize the privacy impact to you.
Pseudonymization is a method that replaces or removes information in the dataset that identifies an individual but permits a data controller or third party to reidentify the personal data with reasonable effort. It is important to be aware that unlike anonymization, pseudonymization does not remove all identifying information from the data but reduces the linkability of a dataset with the identity of an individual.
We do not proactively collect any
Special Categories of Personal Data
about you (this includes details about your race or ethnicity, religious or philosophical beliefs, sex life, sexual orientation, political opinions, trade union membership, information about your health, or genetic information, biometric data for identification purposes, or information about criminal convictions and offences.
If you fail to provide necessary personal data to us (we will let you know when this is the case, for example, by making this information clear in our registration forms), we may not be able to provide you with our goods and/or services.
How does the LEGO Group collect personal data from you?
We collect personal data from the following sources:
Websites
includes any websites operated by or for the LEGO Group, including sites that we operate under our own domains/URLs and mini-sites that we run on third party social networks such as Facebook.
Mobile games/apps
includes mobile games or applications operated by or for the LEGO Group, such as smartphone apps.
E-mail, text and other electronic messages
includes electronic communications between you and the LEGO Group.
Customer Service
includes calls or online chats with our Customer Service personnel.
Retail stores,
which includes stores managed by or for the LEGO Group.
Online registration forms
including LEGO® Insiders account registration, LEGO Life magazine subscriptions.
Offline registration forms
includes printed registration and similar forms that we collect via, for example, postal mail, in-store demos, contests and other promotions, or events.
Online consumer contests and sweepstakes
Our LEGO® Insiders program
including your activities within the program.
Research
in which you and/or your children may participate, both in person and online.
Personal data the LEGO Group may collect from third parties
We may receive personal data about you from various third parties and public sources as set out below:
Technical Data
from the following parties:
analytics providers;
advertising networks; and
search information providers.
Contact, Financial and Transaction Data
from providers of technical, payment and delivery services.
Identity and Contact Data
from data brokers or aggregators.
Identity and Contact Data
from publicly available sources.
Identity, Contact and Login Data
from third parties who you have instructed to share data with us (for example, to sign- in to your LEGO account using a third-party game or social media service like Epic Games or Facebook).
Identity, Contact and Purchaser Data
from retail and entertainment partners such as Merlin Entertainments and LEGO Certified Store partners.
Tracking Data
from third party platforms such as social media platforms or search engines or websites such as partner websites or applications.
How does the LEGO Group use your personal data?
Purposes and legal bases for processing
LEGO® apps and online channels
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Use a LEGO® app or online channel
Technical data
Usage data
Tracking data
Purchase data
Identity data
Profile data
Additionally, data is collected using cookies* on our apps or websites (to the extent you have consented to the use of cookies). See Section 3 of this Policy or our
Cookie Policy
for more information about how cookies work and what types of data they collect
If you want to set up a LEGO® Insiders Account for use on our apps and online channels, we process certain Identity Data, Contact Data and Profile Data, which is provided by you when signing up for a LEGO Insiders Account or editing your profile.
*If a child under the age of majority accesses an online channel that is designed for children by using an age gate, we will obtain parental consent before collecting any personal information from the child (see Section 4 in this Policy for further information)
To optimize the user experience and the functionality of our apps and
To deliver tailored marketing, including retargeting for users above the age of majority, if you have provided us with your consent (see our
Cookie Declaration
for more information)
For users above the age of majority, to deliver a tailored website content and experiences based on the data we have about you.
To improve and tailor your experience on our apps, websites, and services (like the LEGO® Insiders program and the LEGO.com Preference Center)
To ensure that content from our apps and websites is optimized for you and for your computer or device
To allow you to participate in interactive features when you choose to do so
To help you setup a LEGO® Insiders Account
To verify and document that the creator of a LEGO® Insiders Account is not a child under the age of 16.
To be able to generate statistics and insights based on Aggregated Data to understand the health of our business and measuring the effectiveness of our advertising campaigns and promotions
To give adult users relevant marketing both when engaging with us in our own channels as well as via third party channels (e.g. social media, search sites, market places)
To find recruit potential new customers that look like our current customers
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with our use of cookies (to the extent such consent is provided)
Your consent, art 6(1) (a), GDPR in connection to delivering a tailored website experience.
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to be able to optimize and improve our apps and online channels, to be as relevant to our adult consumers as possible in our marketing efforts both in our own channels as well as in third party channels;, to ensure that our apps and websites are running smoothly for consumers, and to ensure that we process no personal data of a child under the age of 16 without parental consent.
Order fulfillment
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Place an order with us
Identity Data and Contact Data
Purchaser Data
Financial Data
If you want to setup a LEGO® Insiders Account for use on our apps and online channels, we process certain Identity Data, Contact Data and Profile Data, which is provided by you when signing up for a LEGO® Insiders Account or editing your profile.
Transaction Data
Technical Data
To fulfil the purchasing agreement made with you, which includes processing and shipping your orders and administering your rights to return goods or file a complaint
To be compliant with legislation concerning e.g., product recalls, bookkeeping and consumer rights
To know who our shoppers are
To allow you to store your Payment Data, Identity Data and Contact Data or similar for ease of future purchases or interactions with us
To conduct fraud prevention activities
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, in relation to our mutual purchasing agreement
Legal obligation, art. 6(1)(c), GDPR, in relation to our compliance with legislation concerning e.g., product recalls, bookkeeping and consumer rights
Legitimate interest, art. 6(q) (f) GDPR. Our legitimate interest in knowing our shoppers and provide them with a seamless shopping experience
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to prevent fraudulent activities in connection with purchases made on our websites
Customer support
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Interact with our customer support functions
Identity Data and Contact Data
Transaction Data
Usage Data
Technical Data and Information about technical issues
Product questions/complaints
Feedback (e.g., relayed via our communication channels or social media)
General questions
Other information or content regarding the reason for your inquiry
To provide you with support
To locate orders or send you replacements
To gain insights on how we can improve our products and services
To act according to applicable law in responding to consumer complaints
To fulfil the agreement, we have made with your regarding your purchase from us
Your Consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, when you contact our customer support and provide us with information about your support request
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to optimize our customer services and products
Legal obligation, art. 6(1)(c), GDPR, in connection to our compliance with legislation
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, in relation to our mutual purchasing agreement
Digital Marketing communications (e.g email, SMS, push messages in app messages or similar direct marketing)
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Subscribe to one or more of our digital marketing communications where opt in subscription is legally required
Have not opted out of receiving one or more of our digital marketing communications of our newsletters
Marketing and Communications Data
Necessary Identify Data
Information about which type of marketing communication you open and how you engage with the content
To be able to deliver our digital marketing communications to you
To run internal statistics and gain insights and to optimize and tailor both the content and delivery of our communications newsletter to those who want to receive it
To give you relevant marketing based on your interests and preferences both when engaging with us in our own LEGO® branded channels as well as via third party channels (e.g. social media, search sites, market places)
To find /recruit potential new customers that look like our current customers (“look alike”) or ensure that are current customers are not targeted with irrelevant marketing messages (“supression”)
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, which is provided upon your subscription to the marketing communication
Our legitimate interest, art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR in understanding our marketing effectiveness outside our own channels (e.g. via Social Media, search engines or market places)
Your consent, art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR to allow us to target you with personalized marketing outside of our own branded channels (e.g. via Social Media, search engines or market places)
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest in providing you with relevant content of your marketing message based on aggregated insights from shoppers and users on our website
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to get statistics for internal use to improve our products and services
Postal marketing including Catalogues
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Actively shop on our website
Not opt out of receiving a postal marketing from us
Actively requested to receive a LEGO® catalogue
Allow a third-party data broker to send you marketing catalogues
Marketing and Communications Data
Necessary Identity and Contact Data
To send you our postal marketing including catalogues
To share with our third-party data brokers and data aggregators to ensure you are not being sent a LEGO® Catalogue or LEGO postal marketing from both of us at the same time (also called data suppression) or forward your opt-out request to them (where they are data controllers of your personal data)
Based on aggregated data understand the relevance and effectiveness of our marketing towards you to find new customers that are similar to you
Our legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in sending you a postal marketing including catalogues containing similar products to what you have purchased (allowing you subsequently to opt out)
Our legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in sending you the postal marketing including catalogue you have expressly requested from us
Your consent, art 6(1)(a), GDPR, to allow us to use other data we have about you to specifically tailor the content of the postal marketing including catalogues we send to you
Our legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in ensuring a good LEGO® brand experience
Our legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in understanding the general marketing effectiveness of our postal marketing overall.
Our legitimate interest art 6 (1) (f) GDPR in using your data to better understand the characteristics and preferences of our existing customer and use that to find new customers similar to you
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, to allow us to use other data we have about you to specifically tailor the content of the postal marketing including catalogue we send to you
LEGO® Insiders account administration and statistics & insights
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Sign up for and use a LEGO® Insiders account
We process certain Identity Data, Contact Data and Profile Data, which is given by you when signing up for a LEGO® Insiders account or editing your profile
Information about your LEGO® Insiders card number
Transaction Data and Purchaser Data if you have utilized your LEGO® Insiders membership in connection with purchases
Information collected using cookies (to the extent you have consented to the use of cookies)
For us to be able to administer your LEGO® Insiders membership and provide you with access to LEGO® Insiders membership benefits
For us to be able to communicate with you about your LEGO® Insiders membership
To see how you have earned and spent your LEGO® Insiders points
To create a tailored experience when you are logged in to your LEGO® Insiders account, which includes to show products we think you may like
To generate statistics and insights based on Aggregated Data to improve the LEGO® Insiders program and to create more value for our shoppers who sign up. For instance, this includes to improve future rewards selection and policy changes of the LEGO® Insiders program. We do this to be able to assess and optimize the health of the LEGO® Insiders program and to administer, develop and market the program
To give you relevant marketing based on your interests and preferences both when engaging with us in our own LEGO® branded channels as well as via third party channels (e.g. social media, search sites, market places)
To find recruit potential new customers that look like our current customers (“look alike”) or ensure that are current customers are not targeted with irrelevant marketing messages (“suppression”)
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, which is our agreement with you about your LEGO® Insiders
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to provide you with relevant information when using our platforms
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with our use of cookies (to the extent such consent is provided)
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in connection with generating statistics and insights based on Aggregated Data
Our legitimate interest, art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR in using your data to better understand the characteristics and preferences of our existing customer and use that to find new customers that are similar to you
Our legitimate interest, art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR in understanding our marketing effectiveness outside our own channels (e.g., via Social Media, search engines or market places)
Your consent, art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR to allow us to target you with personalized marketing outside of our own channels (e.g., via Social Media, search engines or market places)
LEGO® Insiders account personalized experience and marketing
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Use your LEGO® Insiders account while having provided us with your consent give you relevant content and experiences
Transaction Data, Tracking Data and Purchaser Data if you have utilized your LEGO Insiders membership in connection with purchases, which includes information about which webpages you are browsing on LEGO.com and which products you are clicking on when you are logged into your LEGO Insiders account
Information about which emails or other marketing messages you open and clicked
Information collected using cookies (to the extent you have consented to the use of cookies)
Information about which contests or sweepstakes you participate in
Information about which products you have registered in your LEGO Insiders account
For us to be able to automatically tailor our marketing and your experiences to you and your personal interests from predicting your preferences based on your personal information, including information relating to balances of Insiders points, LEGO Insiders point redemption history, LEGO Insiders member activity, purchase history, product preferences, online browsing cookie data (if opted into separately), your location data and any other information connected to your LEGO Insiders account.
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with advanced analytics. Your consent can be provided by opting-in when creating a LEGO Insiders account or by opting-in on your LEGO Insiders account page
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with personalization flow on LEGO.com
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with our use of cookies (to the extent such consent is provided)
Contests, sweepstakes, marketing and other promotions
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Enter a contest or sweepstake or receive communication from us about contests, sweepstakes, campaigns, or promotions
Identity Data
Contact Data
To administer contests and sweepstakes
To generate statistics and insights based on Aggregated Data for us to establish the health of our business and of our campaigns and promotions
To contact you if you win a prize
Fulfill regulatory requirements
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, which is our agreement with you about the terms of the contest or sweepstake
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR in connection with generating statistics and insights based on Aggregated Data and in connection with contacting you if you win a prize
Legal obligation, art. 6(1)(c), GDPR.
The LEGO Group’s own social networks
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Interact with the LEGO Group’s social networks (such as LEGO® Life , LEGO® Insiders Club, LEGO® Insiders community, and LEGO® Ideas.)
Information you have made available, which may include comments, images, designs, reactions, sharing of our social media account posts or other user generated content
To answer your questions
To report on and analyze user engagement on the platform
To give you the opportunity to influence which new products we launch
To enable you to share information with other users
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in connection with answering your questions and reporting and analyzing on user engagement
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, which is our agreement with you about intellectual property rights assignment
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with advanced analytics and content you post to our social networks
Third party social networks
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Interact with third-party social networking features, such as “Like” functions*
*The social media platforms may use personal information collected from the LEGO Group’s social network account on their platform for their own purposes as described in their own privacy policies
Information you have made available, which may include demographic information about you and where you live, your comments, reactions, sharing of our social media account posts or other user generated content
Analytical performance data for social media posts and digital ads
To report on and analyze user engagement with the content posted on the platform(s)
To give you the opportunity to influence which new products we launch
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in connection with analyzing and reporting on user engagement and post-performance
Live streaming events (in store and online)
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Participate directly in or are captured in the audience or background of a live streaming event in an incidental way*
*Areas will be clearly marked, and we will obtain consent for people directly included
Live video streaming of the event, which includes people in the recorded area.
Identity Data
Contact Data
Tracking Data
To be able to host live streaming events to engage with consumers
With your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with your direct participation in such live streaming events
Legitimate interests, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in connection with persons being captured in the audience or background of a live streaming event in an incidental way
Video monitoring (in stores and other relevant LEGO Group locations)
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Visit our LEGO® Stores or another publicly accessible LEGO Group facility
Video footage of our premises
To prevent and document criminal violations, including forced entry, robbery, theft, assault, or fraud and to provide security and safety for employees.
To analyze foot traffic, store layout and in-store service offerings to enable the best possible store experience
Legitimate interests, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in connection with preventing a breach of law or crimes being committed on LEGO® locations
Business partners and commercial relations
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Enter a commercial relationship with us as a company or private person
Identity Data
Contact Data
Transaction Data
Purchaser Data
Other personal information you provide us with
To be able to manage the commercial relationship with you or your company
To fulfil our obligations in the commercial relationship
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, in relation to our mutual contractual relationship
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to manage our relationship with you or your company
Research
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Participate in research surveys, focus groups, or other research
Identity Data
Contact Data
Photos or videos (if the research is conducted in person)
Other personal information you provide us with
To improve our existing products and services
To develop and improve new products
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR in relation to the market research participant release
We will only retain your personal data for as long as reasonably necessary to fulfil the purposes we collected it for, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or reporting requirements. We may retain your personal data for a longer period in the event of a complaint or if we reasonably believe there is a prospect of litigation in respect to our relationship with you.
To determine the appropriate retention period for personal data, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or other requirements.
Who will the LEGO Group share personal data with?
Sharing information with LEGO Group companies
Our subsidiaries (the other companies in the LEGO Group) may sometimes need to access your information to provide services to you on our or their own behalf. They need your personal data so we or they can perform the activities listed in the table above, including as an example:
Deliver products and services you’ve requested
Get in touch with you about your account or transactions
Send you information about our sites, applications and policies
Send you direct marketing messages
Send you product catalogues and other printed marketing materials.
Process information that the subsidiary is formally contracted to process on our behalf, e.g. carry out a purchase placed by you, manage your LEGO® Account, LEGO® Insiders Account activity, and/or manage your preferences in our Preference Center on LEGO.com or in our cookie settings.
Internal research, analytics and reporting
Identify, review and stop any activities that could breach our policies or break the law.
Transfers to LEGO Group companies outside of the European Economic Area are based on Binding Corporate Rules.
Sharing information with other companies
Please see our category list of trusted third parties that we may share your information with here.  We process personal data with third parties/vendors in the following categories:
IT Service providers.
We use a series of trusted partners worldwide to provide us with IT services and system administration services - in regard to both our customer and partner facing activities as well as our internal IT and administration systems.
Global payment provider and processing partners.
These help us to secure a safe and efficient payment process both online, in our stores or through invoicing or money transfers.
Cloud storage partners.
We store our and your data at secure data centers.
Fraud prevention and detection partners and agencies.
These work with the LEGO Group to secure that the LEGO Group is not defrauded.
Warehousing, packing, shipping and delivery partners.
These help us get our products into the hands of our customers and business partners.
Catalogue printing, mailing and postal partners.
These help us make sure catalogues, magazines or other printed marketing materials come your way.
Data broker and data aggregator partners.
These help us reach potential new shoppers with catalogues, magazines and other printed or online marketing and advertising. They also help us prevent that e.g. more than one LEGO® catalogue comes your way at the same time.
Marketing and advertising partners.
These help us to be able to provide tailored advertisements, promotions, sweepstakes, contests and campaigns both when you are interacting with the LEGO Group on online platforms, on social media, instore or otherwise. They also help us find new potential shoppers to serve marketing messages (also called “look alike”) or help us better ensure that we do not serve a marketing message to shoppers who are not interested in the product or service in question (also called “suppression”).
B2B partners including Merlin Entertainments and LEGO Certified Stores partners.
They help us to be able to operate promotions, sweepstakes, contests and campaigns including the LEGO® Insiders loyalty program or LEGO® Family Club, as well as help us to be able to provide tailored advertisements and shopper insights.
Social media partners and online search platforms.
These help us to be present, allow you to interact with the LEGO® Group on the platforms where you are, and allow us to provide tailored marketing of our products as well as provide us with an broader understanding of how our shoppers and consumers interact with us via these platforms and partners.
Survey, questionnaires and product review suppliers.
These help us get your all-important feedback of your LEGO® experience.
Tax and customs authorities, regulators and other authorities globally.
These require reporting of processing activities in certain circumstances.
Professional advisers. Including lawyers, bankers, auditors and insurers globally.
These provide consultancy, banking, legal, insurance and accounting services to the LEGO Group.
Gaming platform partners.
These help us to be present, allow you to interact with the LEGO Group, and to link your LEGO Account with the gaming platform account where this functionality is available.
Other uses and disclosures
We will also use and disclose personal data as we believe to be necessary or appropriate: (a) to comply with applicable laws (which may include laws outside the country you live in); (b) to respond to requests from public and government authorities (which may include authorities outside the country you live in); (c) to cooperate with law enforcement; (d) to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and that of our affiliates, you or others.
In addition, we will use, disclose or transfer personal data to a third party in the event of any reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment.
Transfers to third countries
The LEGO Group may transfer personal data to organizations in so-called third countries (countries outside of the European Economic Area). Such transfers can be made if any of the following conditions apply;
The EU Commission has decided that there is an adequate level of protection in the country in question; or
Binding Corporate Rules (BCR) are in place (for inter-company transfers); or
Standard Contractual Clauses
(EU model-clauses) are used; or
Exceptions in special situations apply, such as to fulfil a contract with you or your consent to the specific transfer.
SECTION 3: COOKIES AND SIMILAR TECHNOLOGIES (“COOKIES”)
Cookies are small data files that your browser places on your computer or device. A cookie itself does not contain or collect information. However, when it is read by a server via a web browser it can help a website deliver a more user-friendly service – for example, remembering previous purchases or account details.
For more information about cookies and how to manage them, please read our full
Cookie Policy
and
Cookie Declaration.
or click on your cookie settings on LEGO.com or in the digital game or app (where applicable).
SECTION 4: INFORMATION FOR PARENTS
Information for parents: how the LEGO Group handles children’s personal data
Keeping children safe online
We care deeply about making sure children are safe online and have extra privacy processes in place to make sure we’re keeping our younger fans safe when they’re using our online channels. In fact, some features have age gates so to prevent children from inadvertently using such features. We also take all reasonable care to secure that we don’t knowingly collect, store, use or process personal information from children who may use those features without proper parental consent.
We’ve joined a digital child safety program which audits our company on a yearly basis to make sure we follow the rules in the way interact with children online.
When it comes to personal data, we seek parental consent for anyone under the age of 16 years (or older, in countries where local laws so require).
If you have any questions or concerns about our Privacy Policy, please
contact us
.
When we do process personal information from children, we take extra steps to protect their privacy including:
Making sure we tell parents what personal information we collect, store, use and process from their child and explaining whether we share the information;
Meeting legal requirements by asking for parental consent to collect, use and process a child’s data and asking for consent to send their children information about our products and services;
Limiting how we collect, store, use and process personal information from children so only data that is reasonably needed for them to take part in an online activity is collected;
Giving parents access or the option to ask for access to personal information we’ve collected from their child – parents can also ask for their children’s personal information to be changed or deleted.
Collecting and using children’s information
While some of our websites, channels and apps are designed with families and users of all ages in mind, others are intended to be used mainly by children. Whenever we collect personal information from a child, we only keep the information for the time we need it to provide a service or for the time it’s legally required to be kept on record.
While children can choose whether to share their information with us, there are features of our websites that won’t function if they haven’t given us their information. Where personal information is needed for features to function, we’ll only ask for information that is reasonably required to take part in the activity.
Here are some examples of times when we collect children’s data:
When children register online.
Children can register on our websites to access a variety of services including content, games and competitions. During registration, we may ask a child to provide their parent’s or guardian’s email address, the child’s first name, gender, their birth date, their username and password. We use this information for security and notification reasons. We strongly encourage children to create a username that excludes any personal information.
When children share content they’ve created themselves.
Some of our websites allow children to create or use content themselves. Since only some of these features require personal information from the child, not all activities require consent from a parent or guardian. Whenever an activity could potentially allow a child to share personal information, we’ll ask the parent or guardian for ‘verifiable parental consent’ (which is a higher level of parental consent). Examples of personal data could be stories, free-text fields, drawings that allow text or free-hand entry of information, photographs of the child, sound clips, movie files or any type of content or other persistent identifiers that clearly identifies the child in some way.
When children enter contests and sweepstakes.
If a child wants to enter a competition, we ask for the personal information we need for a child to take part. We usually only ask for the child’s first name (so we can tell the difference between children from the same family) and the email address of a parent or guardian (so we meet legal requirements to notify the responsible adult). We’ll only contact the parent if the child wins the contest or sweepstake to find out where to send the prize. If the competition asks the child to create content to enter, we may need to ask for parental consent by email in advance to ensure we meet the privacy requirements for content children have created themselves (please see the information above about children creating content). Without consent, children won’t be able to take part in our competitions.
When children receive emails from us.
We may need to ask for a  child’s contact details (including their email address) so that we can reply to a question they’ve asked us. If we need to get in touch with the child a second time, for example to reply to additional questions, we request an email address from their parent or guardian. We then only keep the child’s online contact information for the time it takes us to honor their request and wouldn’t use the information for any other purpose. If we ever need a child’s online contact information for ongoing communication, we ask for the parent’s or guardian’s email address at the earliest opportunity so that we can keep the adult informed of the data we’re collecting and to give the parent an option to ask us to stop collecting data. Parents or guardians can opt out of any communication we have with their child at any time by following the unsubscribe instructions within each communication (if there is more than one type of communication, the adult may need to opt out of each individually). Alternatively, they can contact our LEGO Customer Service team.
When children receive app push notifications.
Many apps send users ‘push notifications’ to their customers’ mobile phones or devices to tell them about updates (sometimes even when the app is not in use). Some of our apps are designed to be used by children. We ask children to provide the email address of their parent or guardian, so we can tell the adult about their child’s request before we send children push notifications from our apps. We don’t link the device identifier with any other personal information without parental consent. If you would like your child to stop receiving push notifications from one of apps, you can change the settings on the device your child’s using at any time.
When we collect location information.
Some of our websites, channels and apps are designed for children. We request consent from a parent or guardian by email before collecting information on a child’s street name, address or coordinates. We do that because such information will effectively make us able to identify a specific child. As an opposite, we don’t require parental consent to collect information on a child’s city, country or region as long as it isn’t linked directly to the specific child. The reason for this, is that such generic information will not make us able to identify a specific child. If you would like to stop us collecting this type of location information, you can adjust the settings on the device your child is using at any time. Alternatively, please contact our LEGO Customer Service team.
When we collect ‘persistent identifiers’.
In order to give visitors to our online channels more relevant and personalized online experiences, we collect some types on information (e.g. information on IP addresses, mobile device identifier, browsers, internet service providers, referring pages, exit pages, visitor frequency, operating systems, date stamps, time stamps and clickstream data). We collect this information using technologies such as cookies, pixels, flash cookies, web beacons and other unique identifiers (which we define under the Cookie section of this Privacy Policy). We may collect this information ourselves or ask a third party to process the data on our behalf. We use this data to give children access to online features and activities, to customize content, to improve our online channels, to analyze the performance of our online channel and to create anonymous reports. If we ever want to collect children’s personal data for any reason, we would contact the child’s parent or guardian for consent in advance. A list of third-party operators who collect ‘persistent identifiers’ on our sites and apps can be found in our
Cookie Policy
and
Cookie Declaration
.
Requesting parental consent
We use different types of parental consent depending on what type of children’s data we are processing and for what purpose.
Asking for parental consent by email
If we need to collect a child’s personal information to provide a service requested by the child, we’ll ask for parental consent according to legal requirements (e.g. COPPA for the US and GDPR for EU). We’ll send the child’s parent or guardian an email explaining what information we’re collecting, how we plan to use it and ask the parent to give or deny their consent. If we don’t receive parental consent in a reasonable time, we’ll delete all information we’ve collected from the child including the adult’s contact information that we asked for in order to request consent.
Asking for ‘verified parental consent’
If a child wants to share personal information publicly or with a third party via one of our websites or digital experiences, we’ll seek a higher level of parental consent than the email request described above. We may ask for verification by credit card or other payment method (with a nominal charge involved), or a review of the parent’s government issued ID.
What if a parent or guardian hasn’t been contacted for consent?
If a child under the age of 16 accesses an online channel that’s designed for children by using an age gate, we’ll email the child’s parent or guardian before collecting any personal information from the child. If you think that your child is taking part in an online activity that collects their personal information and you or another parent/guardian hasn’t received an email contacting you for consent, please
contact us
. We won’t use email addresses provided for parental consent for any other purpose unless the adult has expressly opted-in to marketing emails or taken part in an activity which allows email contact.
Parental choices and controls
At any time, parents or guardians can refuse to allow us to use and collect further personal information from their child. Parents or guardians can ask us to delete the personal information we have collected in connection with their child’s account from our records. As personal information is required for some services, deleting a child’s records may result in an account, membership, or service being unavailable to the child in the future.
If a child has a registered LEGO Account, parents or guardians can access, change or delete the personal information we’ve collected from their child by:
Using their child’s username and password to log into their child’s LEGO Account; or
Getting in touch with our LEGO Customer Service team
If you’d prefer to
contact us
please let us know your child’s username along with your own telephone number and email address. We’ll need to confirm your identity as the parent or guardian of the child before granting access to the child’s personal information. We will respond to your request within a reasonable timeframe.
SECTION 5: INFORMATION FOR KIDS
Information for kids: Child Friendly Privacy Information
Who are we?
We are the LEGO Group and we want to inspire and develop the builders of tomorrow.  We make lots of products like LEGO® bricks and sets, as well as digital apps and games.  We also operate retail stores around the world and on the internet, and we operate the LEGO.com website.
This Privacy Policy tells you how we use your personal data, so you know what happens with it when you give it to us.
Sometimes there are links to other pages.  You might want an adult to help with these because they can sometimes be confusing.
Personal data?  What’s that?
Anything that can be used to identify you is your personal data.  You might already know this could be things like your name or a photo of you, but it is also things like your email address or online username.
The LEGO Group uses a lot of personal data.  If you want to know more, please ask an adult to help you read the entire Privacy Policy.
Why do you need my personal data?
The main reason we need to use your personal data is to know who you are.
If you are logged in to one of our apps or games, we use your personal data to keep track of your game progress, to help you stay connected with your friends in the app or game, or to let you save content you have uploaded to your LEGO Account.
We sometimes also use your personal data because of an event you take part in, or a competition we organize, to make sure if you win that you get your prize.
If we don’t have your personal data, it means we might not be able to do certain things for you.  We might not be able to remember how far you made it in a certain game, or let you upload photos to share with friends.
If you want to know more about what we are doing with your personal data, you can ask an adult to read the full Privacy Policy with you to help you understand the details.
So, can you just use my personal data for anything?
Nope!  We can only use your personal data for certain reasons.
We provide a lot of online services, and there are some rules that say we need to use your personal data to do our work and deliver the service to you, and we can do this without asking you first.
Other times, we need to get consent from your parents. If you or your parents (or guardians) say no then we won’t (and can’t) use your personal data.
Can anyone else see my personal data?
Sometimes we need to share your personal data to do our work. We’re very careful about how we do this, which means there are even more rules.
We might need to share your data with your family if they are helping you. Also, we might need to share your data with other people. Please ask an adult to help you read our full Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy and Cookie Declaration.
Do you keep my personal data forever?
We are only allowed to keep your personal data for as long as we need it. Depending on the circumstances, this period can vary.
Do I have a say in what happens to my personal data?
Yes you do. You have what we call 'rights' when we use your data. One of these is the right to know what we do with it. That’s what this page is for.
You can ask us to tell you what personal data we have about you, or you can tell us to stop using it or delete it. If your personal data is wrong or incorrect, you can tell us and we will fix it.
The rights you have depend on what we use your data for, and there is a lot more information in this Privacy Policy. Please ask an adult to help you read it.
Who makes sure you follow all the rules?
We have someone here at the LEGO Group called our Data Protection Officer, and their job is to protect your data. This means they make sure we are following all the rules, and that your data is safe. If they see something wrong, they tell us how we can fix it.
It is very important for us to keep your data safe, and to follow all the rules.  If you are worried about what we do with your personal data, please
contact us
.
There is also a government agency whose job it is to make sure companies like us follow the rules, and correct us if we do things wrong. You can also email or write to them. You will find their contact information at www.datatilsynet.dk.
About our website
Like lots of websites, our website downloads tiny files called “cookies” onto your computer.  These help our website to work properly for you.  You can find out more about cookies in our Captain Safety video,
here.
LEGO BrickLink, Inc. Privacy Policy
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.bricklink.com/v3/privacy_policy.page:
Welcome to LEGO BrickLink, Inc.’s (“BrickLink”) privacy policy! This policy will give you information about how we look after your personal data when you visit our website or use the services available on our website (our services). The policy also tells you about your privacy rights that may be available to you under applicable law.
The Data Controller
LEGO BrickLink, Inc., 16815 Von Karman Avenue Ste 100, Irvine, CA 92606 USA, and LEGO Systems, Inc., 100 Print Shop Road, Enfield, CT 06082 USA are joint data controllers for your data.
How to contact us
If you have any questions about this policy, please contact us at
customersupport@bricklink.com
.
The Data We Collect About You
We collect information about visitors to our website, including persons who visit our website but do not register, persons who register with our website, and persons who act as buyers or sellers on our website. We collect information directly from you, about you from other entities, and automatically as you use our website and our services. In this privacy policy, unless we distinguish among types of visitors to our website, the scope of information that we collect applies to all visitors to our website. Please see additional notice to residents of the People’s Republic of China regarding data submission.
Information We Collect From You:
The type of information that we collect from you varies based on your interaction with our website and may include:
Account Creation: We require you to register with us before taking certain actions on our website. Specifically, you must register with us before making buying or selling an item in our marketplace, to take certain actions within our Studio Gallery, or to participate in our community discussions (i.e., our forum). To register, we collect your email address, your chosen username, and your region and country. You may choose to include information in your profile such as wanted items, interests, and a photograph of you (Collage Image). You may create an account without making a purchase. If you choose to purchase an item offered through the marketplace, then we collect your name, shipping and billing address, phone number as well as information about your purchase, including the item(s) purchased, the price, the seller from which you made the purchase, your payment card data, and all communication you make on our platform regarding the order. See below to learn more about information collected through our Forum.
Additional Information Collected from Sellers: If you choose to participate in our online marketplace as a seller, we will collect data about the items you list for sale, the sale price, and additional information about you as a seller. In order to register as a seller, you must complete the New Seller Verification procedure, which will involve sending us images of legal documents to verify your identity.
Reviews (feedback): Both sellers and buyers may publicly rate one another, and ratings will be associated with the respective accounts and available to other visitors to our website.
Disputes: Both sellers and buyers may submit private transaction-related disputes (NSS/NPB). We will collect all communication and record of actions regarding these disputes and associate them with the respective accounts.
Other Communications with Us: We also will collect any other information that you provide to us. For example, if you send an inquiry to customer service or otherwise contact us, we will collect that information from you. Depending upon the type of inquiry, we may associate that information with your account.
Our Forums: Our platform facilitates communications among other LEGO® enthusiasts, and registered users may communicate with one another through our Gallery and Forum (collectively, our “Forums”). Any information posted to our Forums is considered public information, and although we do not actively monitor Forum content, we may use Forum content to make decisions in relation to user accounts.
Information Collected from Other Entities:
We also receive information via non-affiliated entities when you visit our page on social media sites or channels (e.g., Facebook, Twitter, YouTube, Instagram, Wechat etc).
As noted above, buyers and sellers may submit public reviews (feedback) about their buying/selling experience; we will collect that information and associate it with your account.
Information We Collect Automatically:
We collect information automatically using cookies, web beacons, and other automated technologies, when you use our website and our services. The type of information that we collect includes your internet protocol address, device ID (as permitted by the manufacturer if you access our website through your mobile device), length of time you are on our website, pages you click, and other information related to website usage. For additional information, please see our Cookies section below.
Collection of Data from Minors:
BrickLink users must be 18 years old in order to register for and maintain an account on our website and to use our Forums. BrickLink does not knowingly collect or share personal information directly from children—persons under the age of 13, or another age if required by applicable law—other than when required to comply with the law.
How We Use Your Personal Data
We use your personal data for the following purposes:
To facilitate your purchase and sale of products through our online marketplace.
To process and create your registration.
To participate in our forum.
To provide our services to you, to respond to your inquiries, and for other customer service purposes.
As permitted by applicable law, to send you information about products and services we believe may be of interest to you. These communications may include products and services of our affiliated entities and of other entities that we think may be of interest to you.
To assist us in advertising on third party websites, mobile apps, and other online services, and to evaluate the success of our adverting campaigns through third party channels (including our online targeted advertising and offline promotional campaigns).
To protect our rights and interests, including the rights and interests of other users of our website, as part of our general business operations, and for other business administration purposes.
For research and analytics purposes.
To administer surveys and questionnaires, such as for market research or user satisfaction purposes.
For legal purposes, including to respond to requests from law enforcement.
For fraud prevention. Please note that we may use automated decision-making in processing your personal data in connection with fraud prevention and detection. If you are an EU resident, then you may request a manual review of the accuracy of an automated decision if you are denied the ability to participate as a buyer or seller or to make a purchase through our platform.
To evaluate the use of our website and to improve the usage of our website. For example, we may review which features of our website are most popular. We also may review your feedback to help us determine how to improve our website.
When We Share Your Personal Data
We share your personal data with the following categories of persons/entities for the purposes below:
Buyers/Sellers: If you make a purchase from a seller through our website, then we will provide your name, postal address, email address, and phone number (if available) to the seller for purposes of order fulfilment. Similarly, the buyer also will be able to see the seller’s contact information. This information will be available on the Orders Placed or Orders Received portions of our website. Sellers you transact with may use your information to contact you for marketing purposes and to ensure you are not circumventing any seller-specific terms or requirements.
Other Users of our Forums: If you choose to participate in our Forums, any information that you post to our website will be available to all other forum users, including public users that are not logged in. Please see additional information about the Forums below.
Affiliates: We share your information with our affiliated entities, which, to the extent permitted by local law, may use your information to contact you for marketing purposes. Specifically, if permitted by law or with your consent, our affiliates may send you email communications about products and services that they believe would be of interest to you. Our affiliates may also help us by performing the following services:
Deliver products and services you’ve requested
Get in touch with you about your account or transactions
Send you information about our websites, applications and policies
Send you any newsletters you’ve signed up for (you can unsubscribe at any time)
Process information that the affiliate is formally contracted to process on our behalf, e.g. carry out a purchase placed by you, manage your account activity or your account data.
Identify, review and stop any activities that could breach our policies or break the law
Service Providers: We share your personal data with our service providers, which include couriers, payment providers, IT platform providers, fraud detection and prevention providers, survey providers, product catalogue providers and customer service suppliers to deliver services on our behalf.
Sharing information on Social Media (Features) and Widgets: Our website includes social media links such as the Facebook ‘like’ button and widgets like ‘Share this button’. If you click on any of these links, the features may collect your IP Address and record which page you were visiting at the time. The features may also use cookies so that the feature can function properly. Social media features and widgets are hosted by third parties or may be hosted directly on our website. When you’re using these features and widgets, your personal data will be processed by that entity according to its own privacy policies.
Non-Affiliated Entities: as permitted by applicable law, or with your consent, we may share your personal data with third parties that may market their products and services to you.
We also share your information in the following circumstances:
When we need to enforce the terms of use or the policies that we ask customers to agree to;
When we need to protect the safety, security, rights and property of our customers or partners;
When we need to meet legal processes or if disclosure of the data is required by law;
If (i) we or our affiliates, are or may be acquired by, merged with, or invested in by another company, or (ii) if any of our assets are or may be transferred to another company, whether as part of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding or otherwise, we may transfer the information we have collected from you to the other company. As part of the business transfer process, we may share certain of your personal data with lenders, auditors, and advisors, including attorneys and consultants.
Communications Preferences
Once you have created an account with us, you may exercise your preferences with regard to the communications that you want to receive from us, our affiliates, sellers, buyers, and other users of our website. For example, you may choose to receive coupons or notifications from a particular seller, or general notifications when items on your wanted list have been listed for sale. You may change your preferences at any time by visiting the preference center (My Settings). Please note that if you have previously purchased an item from a particular seller, then that seller will have your contact information and may use that information for its own purposes.
Sharing information on Our Forums
As our Forums can be read by everyone, any personal data you share on them can be seen publicly. When you post to our Forums, your username, country, state/region, and content of your post will be made available on our website. Personal information, especially contact information, is expressly prohibited in our Forums and will be removed when discovered. However, any personal information that you post will become public at least for a short period of time, and we cannot prevent such information from being used in a manner that may violate this Policy, the law, or your personal privacy.
Our Cookie Policy
Like most websites, our online channels and our applications (apps) collect some information (e.g. information on IP addresses, browsers, internet service providers, referring pages, exit pages, operating systems, date stamps, time stamps and clickstream data) through cookies and other technologies. We may combine this information with other personal data we collect from you (and our service providers may do so on our behalf).
Cookies are alphanumeric identifiers that we transfer to your device’s hard drive through your web browser for record-keeping, analytic, and advertising purposes. Some cookies allow us to make it easier for you to navigate our website and apps, while others are used to enable a faster log-in process or to allow us to track your activities at our website and apps.
Most web browsers automatically accept cookies, but if you prefer, you can edit your browser options to block them in the future. The Help portion of the toolbar on most browsers will tell you how to prevent your computer from accepting new cookies, how to have the browser notify you when you receive a new cookie, or how to disable cookies altogether. Visitors to our online channels and apps who disable cookies will be able to browse certain areas of the online channels and apps, but some features may not function.
Both we and our service providers use browser storage, app storage, cookies, pixels, beacons, scripts and tags to analyze trends, administer the site, track user movement through the site and collect demographic information about our overall user base. We may receive reports on these from our service providers on an individual and aggregate basis. For more information about cookies, please read our full
Cookie Policy
.
Analytics. We use automated devices and applications, such as Google Analytics, to evaluate usage of our websites and apps. We use these tools to help us improve the performance of our websites and apps and our users’ experiences. These entities may use cookies and other tracking technologies, such as web beacons or local storage objects (LSOs), to perform their services. To learn more about Google’s privacy practices, please review the Google Privacy Policy at
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/
. You can also download the Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on to prevent your data from being used by Google Analytics at
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Do-Not-Track. Currently, our systems do not recognize browser “do-not-track” requests. You may, however, disable certain tracking as discussed in this section (e.g., by disabling cookies); you also may opt-out of targeted advertising by following the instructions in the Ad Network section.
Ad Networks
We use network advertisers to serve advertisements on our website and on non-affiliated websites or other media (e.g., social networking platforms). This enables us and these network advertisers to target advertisements to you for products and services in which you might be interested. Ad network providers, advertisers, sponsors and/or traffic measurement services may use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), Flash LSOs and other tracking technologies to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalize advertising content to you. These cookies and other technologies are governed by each entity's specific privacy policy, not this one. We may provide these advertisers with information, including personal data, about you.
As noted above, we disclose certain information (such as your email address) to Google (to opt-out of Google Analytics Audiences and other Google advertising, go
here
)—so that we can better target ads and content to you and others with similar interests on non-affiliated websites or media (“Custom Audiences”). We may also work with other ad networks and marketing platforms that enable us and other participants to target ads to Custom Audiences submitted by us and others. You may also control how Google and other entities display certain ads to you, as explained further in their respective privacy policies or by using the opt-outs described below.
Users may opt out of many ad networks. For example, you may go to the Digital Advertising Alliance ("DAA")
Consumer Choice Page for
information about opting out of interest-based advertising and their choices regarding having information used by
DAA companies
. You may also go to the Network Advertising Initiative ("NAI")
Consumer Opt-Out Page
for information about opting out of interest-based advertising and their choices regarding having information used by
NAI members
. If you are in the European Union, you may opt out of certain third-party cookies that we and other websites may use for targeted advertising through the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA)
Your Online Choices Page
or
www.aboutads.info
.
Opting out from one or more companies listed on the DAA
Consumer Choice Page
or the NAI
Consumer Opt-Out Page
will opt you out from those companies' delivery of interest-based content or ads to you, but it does not mean you will no longer receive any advertising through our website, apps, or on other websites. You may continue to receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads). Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you opt out on the DAA or NAI websites, your opt out may not be effective. Additional information is available on the DAA's website at
www.aboutads.info
or the NAI's website at
www.networkadvertising.org
.
Data security and integrity
The security, integrity and confidentiality of customer information is extremely important to us. We use technical, administrative and physical security measures to protect personal data from unauthorized access, disclosure, use and modification, including encryption for certain external transfers containing personal data. Credit card information is handled by approved service providers that meet PCI (Payment Card Industry) standards.
Our customers, employees and partners also play an important role in protecting information. We encourage customers to choose passwords that are difficult for others to guess and to keep their personal passwords secret.
Data transfers, storage and processing globally
As we’re a global company, we may transfer your personal data to individual subsidiaries or to service providers in locations around the world for the purposes described in this privacy policy.
Notice to European Union Residents:
The Legal Bases for Using Your Personal Data. We collect your personal data as a data controller when we have a legal basis to do so. The following legal bases pertain to our collection of data:
Our use of your personal data is in our legitimate interest as a commercial organization (for example, in order to make improvements to our products and services and to provide you with information you request); you have a right to object to processing as explained in the section below entitled Your Legal Rights;
Our use of your personal data is necessary to perform a contract or take steps to enter into a contract with you (for example, to facilitate your use of the online channels when you agree to our Terms of Service, where we use your personal data to respond to your customer service requests);
Our use of your personal data is necessary to comply with a relevant legal or regulatory obligation that we have (for example, where we are required to disclose personal data to a court or tax authority).
Our use of your personal data is in accordance with your consent (for example, when you consent to receive electronic marketing communications from us). If you have provided your consent to our processing of your personal data you can withdraw this consent at any time by contacting
customersupport@bricklink.com
.
If you would like to find out more about the legal bases on which we process personal data, please contact us using the details below.
Retention of Your Personal Data. We retain your personal data for as long as necessary to provide our services to you, to fulfil the purposes described in this policy and/or our business purposes, or as required by law, regulation, or internal policy.
Profiling. We may analyze users purchases, online activities, interests, and preferences in order to provide our services, such as to customize our online channels and app, and for our marketing purposes.
Your Legal Rights. Subject to certain exemptions, and in some cases dependent upon the processing activity we are undertaking, when we act as a data controller, European Union residents have certain rights in relation to their personal data:
Right to access, correct, and delete your personal data:
You have the right to request access to the personal data that we hold about you and: (a) the source of your personal data; (b) the purposes, legal basis and methods of processing; (c) the data controller’s identity; and (d) the entities or categories of entities to whom your personal data may be transferred.
You also have the right to request that we delete your personal data.
We are not required to comply with your request to erase personal data if the processing of your personal data is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation or for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims.
Right to restrict the processing of your personal data:
You have the right to restrict the use of your personal data when: (i) you contest the accuracy of the data; (ii) the use is unlawful but you do not want us to erase the data; (iii) we no longer need the personal data for the relevant purposes, but we require it for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims; or (iv) you have objected to our personal data use where such use is justified on our legitimate interests and we must verify as to whether we have a compelling interest to continue to use your personal data.
We can continue to use your personal data following a request for restriction, where:
we have your consent; or
to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or
to protect the rights of another natural or legal person.
Right to data portability:
To the extent that we process your personal data (i) based on your consent or under a contract; and (ii) through automated means, you have the right to receive such personal data in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format, or you can ask to have it transferred directly to another data controller.
Right to object to the processing of your personal data:
You can object to any processing of your personal data which has our legitimate interests as its legal basis, if you believe your fundamental rights and freedoms outweigh our legitimate interests. If you raise an objection, we have an opportunity to demonstrate that we have compelling legitimate interests which override your rights and freedoms.
Right to obtain a copy of personal data safeguards used for transfers outside your jurisdiction:
You can ask to obtain a copy of, or reference to, the safeguards under which your personal data is transferred outside of the EEA.  As described above, your personal information may be transferred by us to countries outside of the EU. When we do so, we will take steps designed to ensure that the transfer complies with data protection law, which may include entering into data transfer agreements and relying on certification schemes such as the EU-US Privacy Shield Framework. You can ask to obtain a copy of, or reference to, the safeguards under which your personal information will be transferred.
Right to lodge a complaint with your local supervisory authority:
You have a right to lodge a complaint with your local supervisory authority if you have concerns about how we are processing your personal data.
We ask that you please attempt to resolve any issues with us first, although you have a right to contact your supervisory authority at any time.
How to Exercise Your Rights:
If you would like to exercise any of the rights described above, please send us a request at
customersupport@bricklink.com
. In your message, please indicate the right you would like to exercise and the information that you would like to access, review, correct, or delete.
We may ask you for additional personal data to confirm your identity and for security purposes before disclosing the personal data requested to you. We reserve the right to charge a fee where permitted by law, for instance if your request is manifestly unfounded or excessive.
We may not always be able to fully address your request, for example if it would affect the duty of confidentiality we owe to others or if we are legally entitled to deal with the request in a different way.
Notice to California Residents:
If you’re a California resident, you’re permitted by California Civil Code Section 1798.83 to request information regarding the disclosure of your personal data by us to non-affiliated entities for that entity’s own marketing purposes. With respect to these entities, this privacy policy applies only to their activities within the State of California. Please direct your inquiry to
customersupport@bricklink.com
.
Notice to Australian Residents:
In regard to how we process your information to be compliant with local legislation the following will apply in supplement to the privacy policy:
We generally collect personal data directly from you where this is reasonable and practical but may also acquire information from other trusted sources to update or supplement the personal data you provided or which we processed automatically.
We may also use your personal data to tell you about our products and services as well as the products and services of other entities. From time to time, we and our business partners may contact you by mail, telephone, email or other electronic messaging services (such as text, voice, sound or image messages including using automated calling systems) with information about products and services (including discounts and special offers). If you no longer wish to receive marketing or promotional information from us and our partners, you can unsubscribe at any time. There are certain messages relating to the goods and services we provide to you that cannot be unsubscribed from.
Should we experience a data breach and your personal data be involved, we will contact you if there is a risk of serious harm to you and if we are legally obliged to do so. In some instances, we will also be legally obliged to contact (data protection) authorities when a breach of privacy information occurs.
We will take such steps that are reasonable in the circumstances (if any) to destroy or de-identify personal data when it is no longer required.
Notice under Chinese Law (excluding Macau S.A.R., Hong Kong S.A.R. and Taiwan):
This section sets out additional obligations and rights of BrickLink beyond the terms of this policy. If there is any inconsistency between this section and the policy, provisions under this section shall prevail.
Additional information regarding your provision of personal information to us:
if you do not provide certain information that is necessary for the Core/Basic Functions (please refer to the section below entitled “When BrickLink Collects Information from You”), this may impact your use of certain resources or services that are provided by BrickLink;
For the purposes of Chinese residents (excluding Macau S.A.R., Hong Kong S.A.R. and Taiwan):
the following purposes described above will be considered Core/Basic Functions:
Account Creation
Making Purchases
Selling Items
Customer Service Inquiries or Other Communications with BrickLink
the following purposes described above will be considered Additional Functions:
Providing Feedback
Filing a Dispute
Our Forums
Your personal information might be transferred to jurisdictions that may have adopted different levels of protection for personal information or even have no data privacy law. In this circumstance, we will endeavor to ensure that your personal information will be protected to a level that is comparable to the level of protection provided in China. For example, we will, in accordance with the requirements of applicable law, obtain your consent to such cross-border transfer of personal information, put in place data transfer agreements with the data receiver, or de-identify the personal information before transferring the personal information out of China.
Your Legal Rights:
Subject to certain exemptions, and in some cases dependent upon the processing activity we are undertaking, when we act as a data controller, Chinese residents have certain rights in relation to their personal information:
Right to access, correct, and delete your personal information
: You have the right to request access to the personal information that we hold about you and: (a) the source of your personal information; (b) the purposes, legal basis and methods of processing; (c) the data controller’s identity; and (d) the entities or categories of entities to whom your personal information may be transferred.
You also have the right to request that we correct any inaccuracies in your personal information, and also to request that we delete your personal information.
BrickLink may not be able to respond to your requests under the following circumstances:
If the personal information under request is directly related national security and national defense;
If the personal information under request is directly related to public safety, public health, and public interests;
If the personal information under request is directly related to criminal investigation, prosecution, trial, and judgment enforcement, etc.;
If there is sufficient evidence to show that you are exercising these rights in bad faith;
If responding to your request would seriously harm the legitimate rights and interests of yourself, other people or organizations;
If the personal information under request is related to trade secrets
Notice to South Korea Residents:
We are required to obtain specific consent to certain collection and processing of your personal information. When you create an account, you will be asked to consent to the processing and use of your information as described in this policy.
This section sets out additional obligations and rights of BrickLink beyond the terms of this policy. If there is any inconsistency between this section and the policy, provisions under this section shall prevail.
To the extent that BrickLink is subject to the laws of South Korea when collecting, using, disclosing and/or processing personal information, it shall be the “data controller” under such laws.
Retention of Your Personal Information
: We retain your personal information for as long as necessary to provide our services to you, to fulfill the purposes described in this policy and/or our business purposes, or as required by law, regulation, or internal policy.
Your Legal Rights
If you’re a resident of South Korea, you, your legal representative or a third party to whom you have delegated the relevant authority have certain rights in relation to your personal information, subject to certain exemptions
The right to be informed of the processing of such personal information;
The right to consent or not, and to elect the scope of consent, to the processing of personal information;
The right to confirm the processing of such personal information, and to demand access to such personal information;
The right to suspend processing of, and to make correction, deletion and destruction of such personal information; and
The right to appropriate redress for any damage arising out of the processing of such personal information in a prompt and fair procedure.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may change this Privacy Policy to accommodate new technologies, industry practices, regulatory requirements or for other purposes. We will provide prior notice to users by email and post the information on our online channels if these changes are material and request your consent if legally required.
Just necessary
Accept all cookies
LEGO BrickLink (and the third parties listed below) set and use cookies and similar technologies (“cookies”) on this website to give a better and more user-friendly experience, for statistical and analytical purposes and to provide targeted and relevant marketing. You can read more about cookie categories below and use the toggles to decide which categories you wish to opt in to.
We believe you get the most relevant and engaging experience of our website and our brand if you opt in to all the categories. But it’s always your choice! By simply pressing “Just necessary,” we will not set any cookies other than the necessary cookies. We must set necessary cookies for core elements of our website to function, and it cannot be disabled.
Remember, you can always withdraw your consent or change your settings simply by pressing the “cookie settings” option on our website. Please also see our
Cookie Policy
and
Privacy Policy
for more information.
Just necessary
Accept all cookies
Necessary cookies
Preference cookies
Statistics cookies
Third-party marketing cookies
Necessary cookies
Always On
Preference cookies
Off
Statistics cookies
Off
Third-party marketing cookies
Off
Server Time : 2025-03-19T22:07:46-0400
Sub-policy 1
https://www.lego.com/legal/notices-and-policies/privacy-policy/:
LEGO.com
Legal
Notices & Policies
Privacy Policy
Last Modified: February 8, 2024
SECTION 1: DATA PRIVACY LAW AND YOUR DIGITAL RIGHTS
What is this Policy all about?
Welcome to our Privacy Policy! It’s great that you’d like to know more about how we keep your information safe. This policy will give you information about how we look after your personal data when you visit or use our services or our applications (apps). The Privacy Policy also tells you about your privacy rights and how the law protects you.  Finally, this Privacy Policy covers both our online and offline data collection activities, including personal data that we may collect through our various channels such as websites, apps, third party social networks, retail stores, points of sales and events.
This is our overall Privacy Policy. For some jurisdictions, additional country/state specific provisions apply. Click here to be directed to the specific provisions.
In other words, if you’re looking for more information on how we collect, store, use and share your personal data, this is the place for you!
Who is responsible for your personal data?
The LEGO Group is made up by several different legal entities spread around the world. You can read more about the LEGO Group here https://www.lego.com/aboutus.
This Privacy Policy is issued on behalf of all the companies in the LEGO Group where LEGO System A/S is the data controller (the one responsible and in charge of the data).  In some circumstances a local LEGO Group entity has identified their own data controller for their local country where local processing is taking place. For the purposes of this Privacy Policy when we use “we”, “us” or “our” in this Policy, we are talking about LEGO System A/S.
We have appointed a data protection officer (“DPO”) who is responsible for overseeing questions in relation to this Privacy Policy. If you have any questions about this Policy, please
contact us
. You can also send a letter to the DPO at:
LEGO System A/S
Aastvej 1,
7190 Billund,
Denmark
Att: DPO
Please include your name and country to which your inquiry relates.
Your privacy rights
As a data subject you have the following rights in respect of the personal data we hold on you:
Request access to your personal data.
You have a right to access the personal data we are keeping about you. In many cases this information is already present to you in your online services from us. Your right to access may, however, be restricted by legislation, protection of other persons’ privacy and consideration for the LEGO Group’s business practices, know-how, business secrets and internal assessments.
Request correction of incorrect or incomplete data.
If the data we have pertaining to you are incorrect or incomplete, you are entitled to have the data corrected, with the restrictions that follow from legislation.
Request erasure
You have the right to request deletion of your data when:
the personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed;
you withdraw your consent to the processing and there is no other legitimate reason for processing;
you object to the processing and there is no justified reason for continuing the processing;
or the processing is unlawful
Please note that, in certain circumstances, we may be required to retain some of your personal data after you have requested deletion to satisfy our legal or contractual obligations. We may also be permitted by applicable laws to retain some of your personal data to satisfy our business needs.
Limitation of processing of personal data.
If you contest the correctness of the data which we have registered about you or lawfulness of processing, or if you have objected to the processing of the data in accordance with your right to object, you may request us to restrict the processing of this data. The processing will be restricted to storage only, until the correctness of the data can be established, or it can be checked whether our legitimate interests override your interests.  Even when processing of your data has been restricted as described above, the LEGO Group may process your data in other ways if this is necessary to enforce a legal claim or to process previously collected data if you have earlier given your consent.
Object to processing based on our legitimate interest.
You can always object to the processing of personal data about you which is based on legitimate interest.  If we are processing your data for direct marketing and profiling in connection to such marketing, your objection will always be sustained.  For objections to processing for other purposes, we will conduct a legitimate interest balancing test and consider whether to support your objection.
Data portability.
You have a right to receive personal data that you have provided to us in a machine-readable format. This right applies to personal data processed only by automated means and on the basis of consent or of fulfilling a contract.
Other rights.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with The Danish Data Protection Agency, if you are dissatisfied with the way we process your personal data. You will find the Danish Data Protection Agency’s contact information at www.datatilsynet.dk.
Further information: updates
If we change the way we handle your personal data, we will update this Privacy Policy. We reserve the right to make changes to our practices and this Privacy Policy at any time, so please check back frequently to see any updates or changes to our Privacy Policy.
SECTION 2: PERSONAL DATA
What personal data does the LEGO Group collect?
Personal data is any information about a person from which that person can be identified.  We may collect, use, store and transfer different kinds of personal data about you which we have grouped together as follows:
Identity Data
includes first name, last name, username or similar unique identifier, marital status, title, date of birth and gender.
Contact Data
includes billing address, delivery address, email address and telephone numbers or similar contact data.
Financial Data
includes bank account and payment card details.
Transaction Data
includes details about payments to and from you and other details of products and services you have purchased from us.
Technical Data
includes internet protocol (IP) address, your login data, browser type and version, time zone setting and location, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system and platform, user ID, MAC ID and other technology on the devices you use to access this website.
Profile Data
includes your username and password.
Purchaser Data
includes purchases or orders made by you, services requested, rewards or benefits requested or used, your interests, preferences, and feedback or survey responses.
Usage Data
includes information about how you use our website, products and services.
Marketing and Communications Data
includes your preferences in receiving marketing from us and our third parties, participate in sweepstakes and other prize competitions and your communication preferences.
Tracking Data
including data about what pages you visited prior to landing on our websites or where you traveled after visiting our website as well as how you interacted with emails or other messages sent to you by us (e.g. if you deleted or opened the email).
We also collect, use and share
Aggregated Data
such as statistical or demographic data for any purpose. Aggregated Data could be derived from your personal data but is not considered personal data because this data will not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. For example, we may aggregate your Usage Data to calculate the percentage of users accessing a specific website feature. However, if we combine or connect Aggregated Data with your personal data so that it can directly or indirectly identify you, we treat the combined data as personal data which will be used in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
We use
Pseudonymized Data
in order to minimize the privacy impact to you.
Pseudonymization is a method that replaces or removes information in the dataset that identifies an individual but permits a data controller or third party to reidentify the personal data with reasonable effort. It is important to be aware that unlike anonymization, pseudonymization does not remove all identifying information from the data but reduces the linkability of a dataset with the identity of an individual.
We do not proactively collect any
Special Categories of Personal Data
about you (this includes details about your race or ethnicity, religious or philosophical beliefs, sex life, sexual orientation, political opinions, trade union membership, information about your health, or genetic information, biometric data for identification purposes, or information about criminal convictions and offences.
If you fail to provide necessary personal data to us (we will let you know when this is the case, for example, by making this information clear in our registration forms), we may not be able to provide you with our goods and/or services.
How does the LEGO Group collect personal data from you?
We collect personal data from the following sources:
Websites
includes any websites operated by or for the LEGO Group, including sites that we operate under our own domains/URLs and mini-sites that we run on third party social networks such as Facebook.
Mobile games/apps
includes mobile games or applications operated by or for the LEGO Group, such as smartphone apps.
E-mail, text and other electronic messages
includes electronic communications between you and the LEGO Group.
Customer Service
includes calls or online chats with our Customer Service personnel.
Retail stores,
which includes stores managed by or for the LEGO Group.
Online registration forms
including LEGO® Insiders account registration, LEGO Life magazine subscriptions.
Offline registration forms
includes printed registration and similar forms that we collect via, for example, postal mail, in-store demos, contests and other promotions, or events.
Online consumer contests and sweepstakes
Our LEGO® Insiders program
including your activities within the program.
Research
in which you and/or your children may participate, both in person and online.
Personal data the LEGO Group may collect from third parties
We may receive personal data about you from various third parties and public sources as set out below:
Technical Data
from the following parties:
analytics providers;
advertising networks; and
search information providers.
Contact, Financial and Transaction Data
from providers of technical, payment and delivery services.
Identity and Contact Data
from data brokers or aggregators.
Identity and Contact Data
from publicly available sources.
Identity, Contact and Login Data
from third parties who you have instructed to share data with us (for example, to sign- in to your LEGO account using a third-party game or social media service like Epic Games or Facebook).
Identity, Contact and Purchaser Data
from retail and entertainment partners such as Merlin Entertainments and LEGO Certified Store partners.
Tracking Data
from third party platforms such as social media platforms or search engines or websites such as partner websites or applications.
How does the LEGO Group use your personal data?
Purposes and legal bases for processing
LEGO® apps and online channels
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Use a LEGO® app or online channel
Technical data
Usage data
Tracking data
Purchase data
Identity data
Profile data
Additionally, data is collected using cookies* on our apps or websites (to the extent you have consented to the use of cookies). See Section 3 of this Policy or our
Cookie Policy
for more information about how cookies work and what types of data they collect
If you want to set up a LEGO® Insiders Account for use on our apps and online channels, we process certain Identity Data, Contact Data and Profile Data, which is provided by you when signing up for a LEGO Insiders Account or editing your profile.
*If a child under the age of majority accesses an online channel that is designed for children by using an age gate, we will obtain parental consent before collecting any personal information from the child (see Section 4 in this Policy for further information)
To optimize the user experience and the functionality of our apps and
To deliver tailored marketing, including retargeting for users above the age of majority, if you have provided us with your consent (see our
Cookie Declaration
for more information)
For users above the age of majority, to deliver a tailored website content and experiences based on the data we have about you.
To improve and tailor your experience on our apps, websites, and services (like the LEGO® Insiders program and the LEGO.com Preference Center)
To ensure that content from our apps and websites is optimized for you and for your computer or device
To allow you to participate in interactive features when you choose to do so
To help you setup a LEGO® Insiders Account
To verify and document that the creator of a LEGO® Insiders Account is not a child under the age of 16.
To be able to generate statistics and insights based on Aggregated Data to understand the health of our business and measuring the effectiveness of our advertising campaigns and promotions
To give adult users relevant marketing both when engaging with us in our own channels as well as via third party channels (e.g. social media, search sites, market places)
To find recruit potential new customers that look like our current customers
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with our use of cookies (to the extent such consent is provided)
Your consent, art 6(1) (a), GDPR in connection to delivering a tailored website experience.
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to be able to optimize and improve our apps and online channels, to be as relevant to our adult consumers as possible in our marketing efforts both in our own channels as well as in third party channels;, to ensure that our apps and websites are running smoothly for consumers, and to ensure that we process no personal data of a child under the age of 16 without parental consent.
Order fulfillment
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Place an order with us
Identity Data and Contact Data
Purchaser Data
Financial Data
If you want to setup a LEGO® Insiders Account for use on our apps and online channels, we process certain Identity Data, Contact Data and Profile Data, which is provided by you when signing up for a LEGO® Insiders Account or editing your profile.
Transaction Data
Technical Data
To fulfil the purchasing agreement made with you, which includes processing and shipping your orders and administering your rights to return goods or file a complaint
To be compliant with legislation concerning e.g., product recalls, bookkeeping and consumer rights
To know who our shoppers are
To allow you to store your Payment Data, Identity Data and Contact Data or similar for ease of future purchases or interactions with us
To conduct fraud prevention activities
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, in relation to our mutual purchasing agreement
Legal obligation, art. 6(1)(c), GDPR, in relation to our compliance with legislation concerning e.g., product recalls, bookkeeping and consumer rights
Legitimate interest, art. 6(q) (f) GDPR. Our legitimate interest in knowing our shoppers and provide them with a seamless shopping experience
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to prevent fraudulent activities in connection with purchases made on our websites
Customer support
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Interact with our customer support functions
Identity Data and Contact Data
Transaction Data
Usage Data
Technical Data and Information about technical issues
Product questions/complaints
Feedback (e.g., relayed via our communication channels or social media)
General questions
Other information or content regarding the reason for your inquiry
To provide you with support
To locate orders or send you replacements
To gain insights on how we can improve our products and services
To act according to applicable law in responding to consumer complaints
To fulfil the agreement, we have made with your regarding your purchase from us
Your Consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, when you contact our customer support and provide us with information about your support request
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to optimize our customer services and products
Legal obligation, art. 6(1)(c), GDPR, in connection to our compliance with legislation
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, in relation to our mutual purchasing agreement
Digital Marketing communications (e.g email, SMS, push messages in app messages or similar direct marketing)
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Subscribe to one or more of our digital marketing communications where opt in subscription is legally required
Have not opted out of receiving one or more of our digital marketing communications of our newsletters
Marketing and Communications Data
Necessary Identify Data
Information about which type of marketing communication you open and how you engage with the content
To be able to deliver our digital marketing communications to you
To run internal statistics and gain insights and to optimize and tailor both the content and delivery of our communications newsletter to those who want to receive it
To give you relevant marketing based on your interests and preferences both when engaging with us in our own LEGO® branded channels as well as via third party channels (e.g. social media, search sites, market places)
To find /recruit potential new customers that look like our current customers (“look alike”) or ensure that are current customers are not targeted with irrelevant marketing messages (“supression”)
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, which is provided upon your subscription to the marketing communication
Our legitimate interest, art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR in understanding our marketing effectiveness outside our own channels (e.g. via Social Media, search engines or market places)
Your consent, art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR to allow us to target you with personalized marketing outside of our own branded channels (e.g. via Social Media, search engines or market places)
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest in providing you with relevant content of your marketing message based on aggregated insights from shoppers and users on our website
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to get statistics for internal use to improve our products and services
Postal marketing including Catalogues
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Actively shop on our website
Not opt out of receiving a postal marketing from us
Actively requested to receive a LEGO® catalogue
Allow a third-party data broker to send you marketing catalogues
Marketing and Communications Data
Necessary Identity and Contact Data
To send you our postal marketing including catalogues
To share with our third-party data brokers and data aggregators to ensure you are not being sent a LEGO® Catalogue or LEGO postal marketing from both of us at the same time (also called data suppression) or forward your opt-out request to them (where they are data controllers of your personal data)
Based on aggregated data understand the relevance and effectiveness of our marketing towards you to find new customers that are similar to you
Our legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in sending you a postal marketing including catalogues containing similar products to what you have purchased (allowing you subsequently to opt out)
Our legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in sending you the postal marketing including catalogue you have expressly requested from us
Your consent, art 6(1)(a), GDPR, to allow us to use other data we have about you to specifically tailor the content of the postal marketing including catalogues we send to you
Our legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in ensuring a good LEGO® brand experience
Our legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in understanding the general marketing effectiveness of our postal marketing overall.
Our legitimate interest art 6 (1) (f) GDPR in using your data to better understand the characteristics and preferences of our existing customer and use that to find new customers similar to you
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, to allow us to use other data we have about you to specifically tailor the content of the postal marketing including catalogue we send to you
LEGO® Insiders account administration and statistics & insights
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Sign up for and use a LEGO® Insiders account
We process certain Identity Data, Contact Data and Profile Data, which is given by you when signing up for a LEGO® Insiders account or editing your profile
Information about your LEGO® Insiders card number
Transaction Data and Purchaser Data if you have utilized your LEGO® Insiders membership in connection with purchases
Information collected using cookies (to the extent you have consented to the use of cookies)
For us to be able to administer your LEGO® Insiders membership and provide you with access to LEGO® Insiders membership benefits
For us to be able to communicate with you about your LEGO® Insiders membership
To see how you have earned and spent your LEGO® Insiders points
To create a tailored experience when you are logged in to your LEGO® Insiders account, which includes to show products we think you may like
To generate statistics and insights based on Aggregated Data to improve the LEGO® Insiders program and to create more value for our shoppers who sign up. For instance, this includes to improve future rewards selection and policy changes of the LEGO® Insiders program. We do this to be able to assess and optimize the health of the LEGO® Insiders program and to administer, develop and market the program
To give you relevant marketing based on your interests and preferences both when engaging with us in our own LEGO® branded channels as well as via third party channels (e.g. social media, search sites, market places)
To find recruit potential new customers that look like our current customers (“look alike”) or ensure that are current customers are not targeted with irrelevant marketing messages (“suppression”)
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, which is our agreement with you about your LEGO® Insiders
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to provide you with relevant information when using our platforms
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with our use of cookies (to the extent such consent is provided)
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in connection with generating statistics and insights based on Aggregated Data
Our legitimate interest, art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR in using your data to better understand the characteristics and preferences of our existing customer and use that to find new customers that are similar to you
Our legitimate interest, art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR in understanding our marketing effectiveness outside our own channels (e.g., via Social Media, search engines or market places)
Your consent, art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR to allow us to target you with personalized marketing outside of our own channels (e.g., via Social Media, search engines or market places)
LEGO® Insiders account personalized experience and marketing
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Use your LEGO® Insiders account while having provided us with your consent give you relevant content and experiences
Transaction Data, Tracking Data and Purchaser Data if you have utilized your LEGO Insiders membership in connection with purchases, which includes information about which webpages you are browsing on LEGO.com and which products you are clicking on when you are logged into your LEGO Insiders account
Information about which emails or other marketing messages you open and clicked
Information collected using cookies (to the extent you have consented to the use of cookies)
Information about which contests or sweepstakes you participate in
Information about which products you have registered in your LEGO Insiders account
For us to be able to automatically tailor our marketing and your experiences to you and your personal interests from predicting your preferences based on your personal information, including information relating to balances of Insiders points, LEGO Insiders point redemption history, LEGO Insiders member activity, purchase history, product preferences, online browsing cookie data (if opted into separately), your location data and any other information connected to your LEGO Insiders account.
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with advanced analytics. Your consent can be provided by opting-in when creating a LEGO Insiders account or by opting-in on your LEGO Insiders account page
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with personalization flow on LEGO.com
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with our use of cookies (to the extent such consent is provided)
Contests, sweepstakes, marketing and other promotions
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Enter a contest or sweepstake or receive communication from us about contests, sweepstakes, campaigns, or promotions
Identity Data
Contact Data
To administer contests and sweepstakes
To generate statistics and insights based on Aggregated Data for us to establish the health of our business and of our campaigns and promotions
To contact you if you win a prize
Fulfill regulatory requirements
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, which is our agreement with you about the terms of the contest or sweepstake
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR in connection with generating statistics and insights based on Aggregated Data and in connection with contacting you if you win a prize
Legal obligation, art. 6(1)(c), GDPR.
The LEGO Group’s own social networks
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Interact with the LEGO Group’s social networks (such as LEGO® Life , LEGO® Insiders Club, LEGO® Insiders community, and LEGO® Ideas.)
Information you have made available, which may include comments, images, designs, reactions, sharing of our social media account posts or other user generated content
To answer your questions
To report on and analyze user engagement on the platform
To give you the opportunity to influence which new products we launch
To enable you to share information with other users
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in connection with answering your questions and reporting and analyzing on user engagement
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, which is our agreement with you about intellectual property rights assignment
Your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with advanced analytics and content you post to our social networks
Third party social networks
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Interact with third-party social networking features, such as “Like” functions*
*The social media platforms may use personal information collected from the LEGO Group’s social network account on their platform for their own purposes as described in their own privacy policies
Information you have made available, which may include demographic information about you and where you live, your comments, reactions, sharing of our social media account posts or other user generated content
Analytical performance data for social media posts and digital ads
To report on and analyze user engagement with the content posted on the platform(s)
To give you the opportunity to influence which new products we launch
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in connection with analyzing and reporting on user engagement and post-performance
Live streaming events (in store and online)
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Participate directly in or are captured in the audience or background of a live streaming event in an incidental way*
*Areas will be clearly marked, and we will obtain consent for people directly included
Live video streaming of the event, which includes people in the recorded area.
Identity Data
Contact Data
Tracking Data
To be able to host live streaming events to engage with consumers
With your consent, art. 6(1)(a), GDPR, in connection with your direct participation in such live streaming events
Legitimate interests, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in connection with persons being captured in the audience or background of a live streaming event in an incidental way
Video monitoring (in stores and other relevant LEGO Group locations)
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Visit our LEGO® Stores or another publicly accessible LEGO Group facility
Video footage of our premises
To prevent and document criminal violations, including forced entry, robbery, theft, assault, or fraud and to provide security and safety for employees.
To analyze foot traffic, store layout and in-store service offerings to enable the best possible store experience
Legitimate interests, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR, in connection with preventing a breach of law or crimes being committed on LEGO® locations
Business partners and commercial relations
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Enter a commercial relationship with us as a company or private person
Identity Data
Contact Data
Transaction Data
Purchaser Data
Other personal information you provide us with
To be able to manage the commercial relationship with you or your company
To fulfil our obligations in the commercial relationship
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR, in relation to our mutual contractual relationship
Legitimate interest, art. 6(1)(f), GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to manage our relationship with you or your company
Research
What you do
What we collect
Why we collect it
Legal Basis if residing in the EU/EEA
Participate in research surveys, focus groups, or other research
Identity Data
Contact Data
Photos or videos (if the research is conducted in person)
Other personal information you provide us with
To improve our existing products and services
To develop and improve new products
Performance of a contract, art. 6(1)(b), GDPR in relation to the market research participant release
We will only retain your personal data for as long as reasonably necessary to fulfil the purposes we collected it for, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or reporting requirements. We may retain your personal data for a longer period in the event of a complaint or if we reasonably believe there is a prospect of litigation in respect to our relationship with you.
To determine the appropriate retention period for personal data, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or other requirements.
Who will the LEGO Group share personal data with?
Sharing information with LEGO Group companies
Our subsidiaries (the other companies in the LEGO Group) may sometimes need to access your information to provide services to you on our or their own behalf. They need your personal data so we or they can perform the activities listed in the table above, including as an example:
Deliver products and services you’ve requested
Get in touch with you about your account or transactions
Send you information about our sites, applications and policies
Send you direct marketing messages
Send you product catalogues and other printed marketing materials.
Process information that the subsidiary is formally contracted to process on our behalf, e.g. carry out a purchase placed by you, manage your LEGO® Account, LEGO® Insiders Account activity, and/or manage your preferences in our Preference Center on LEGO.com or in our cookie settings.
Internal research, analytics and reporting
Identify, review and stop any activities that could breach our policies or break the law.
Transfers to LEGO Group companies outside of the European Economic Area are based on Binding Corporate Rules.
Sharing information with other companies
Please see our category list of trusted third parties that we may share your information with here.  We process personal data with third parties/vendors in the following categories:
IT Service providers.
We use a series of trusted partners worldwide to provide us with IT services and system administration services - in regard to both our customer and partner facing activities as well as our internal IT and administration systems.
Global payment provider and processing partners.
These help us to secure a safe and efficient payment process both online, in our stores or through invoicing or money transfers.
Cloud storage partners.
We store our and your data at secure data centers.
Fraud prevention and detection partners and agencies.
These work with the LEGO Group to secure that the LEGO Group is not defrauded.
Warehousing, packing, shipping and delivery partners.
These help us get our products into the hands of our customers and business partners.
Catalogue printing, mailing and postal partners.
These help us make sure catalogues, magazines or other printed marketing materials come your way.
Data broker and data aggregator partners.
These help us reach potential new shoppers with catalogues, magazines and other printed or online marketing and advertising. They also help us prevent that e.g. more than one LEGO® catalogue comes your way at the same time.
Marketing and advertising partners.
These help us to be able to provide tailored advertisements, promotions, sweepstakes, contests and campaigns both when you are interacting with the LEGO Group on online platforms, on social media, instore or otherwise. They also help us find new potential shoppers to serve marketing messages (also called “look alike”) or help us better ensure that we do not serve a marketing message to shoppers who are not interested in the product or service in question (also called “suppression”).
B2B partners including Merlin Entertainments and LEGO Certified Stores partners.
They help us to be able to operate promotions, sweepstakes, contests and campaigns including the LEGO® Insiders loyalty program or LEGO® Family Club, as well as help us to be able to provide tailored advertisements and shopper insights.
Social media partners and online search platforms.
These help us to be present, allow you to interact with the LEGO® Group on the platforms where you are, and allow us to provide tailored marketing of our products as well as provide us with an broader understanding of how our shoppers and consumers interact with us via these platforms and partners.
Survey, questionnaires and product review suppliers.
These help us get your all-important feedback of your LEGO® experience.
Tax and customs authorities, regulators and other authorities globally.
These require reporting of processing activities in certain circumstances.
Professional advisers. Including lawyers, bankers, auditors and insurers globally.
These provide consultancy, banking, legal, insurance and accounting services to the LEGO Group.
Gaming platform partners.
These help us to be present, allow you to interact with the LEGO Group, and to link your LEGO Account with the gaming platform account where this functionality is available.
Other uses and disclosures
We will also use and disclose personal data as we believe to be necessary or appropriate: (a) to comply with applicable laws (which may include laws outside the country you live in); (b) to respond to requests from public and government authorities (which may include authorities outside the country you live in); (c) to cooperate with law enforcement; (d) to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and that of our affiliates, you or others.
In addition, we will use, disclose or transfer personal data to a third party in the event of any reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment.
Transfers to third countries
The LEGO Group may transfer personal data to organizations in so-called third countries (countries outside of the European Economic Area). Such transfers can be made if any of the following conditions apply;
The EU Commission has decided that there is an adequate level of protection in the country in question; or
Binding Corporate Rules (BCR) are in place (for inter-company transfers); or
Standard Contractual Clauses
(EU model-clauses) are used; or
Exceptions in special situations apply, such as to fulfil a contract with you or your consent to the specific transfer.
SECTION 3: COOKIES AND SIMILAR TECHNOLOGIES (“COOKIES”)
Cookies are small data files that your browser places on your computer or device. A cookie itself does not contain or collect information. However, when it is read by a server via a web browser it can help a website deliver a more user-friendly service – for example, remembering previous purchases or account details.
For more information about cookies and how to manage them, please read our full
Cookie Policy
and
Cookie Declaration.
or click on your cookie settings on LEGO.com or in the digital game or app (where applicable).
SECTION 4: INFORMATION FOR PARENTS
Information for parents: how the LEGO Group handles children’s personal data
Keeping children safe online
We care deeply about making sure children are safe online and have extra privacy processes in place to make sure we’re keeping our younger fans safe when they’re using our online channels. In fact, some features have age gates so to prevent children from inadvertently using such features. We also take all reasonable care to secure that we don’t knowingly collect, store, use or process personal information from children who may use those features without proper parental consent.
We’ve joined a digital child safety program which audits our company on a yearly basis to make sure we follow the rules in the way interact with children online.
When it comes to personal data, we seek parental consent for anyone under the age of 16 years (or older, in countries where local laws so require).
If you have any questions or concerns about our Privacy Policy, please
contact us
.
When we do process personal information from children, we take extra steps to protect their privacy including:
Making sure we tell parents what personal information we collect, store, use and process from their child and explaining whether we share the information;
Meeting legal requirements by asking for parental consent to collect, use and process a child’s data and asking for consent to send their children information about our products and services;
Limiting how we collect, store, use and process personal information from children so only data that is reasonably needed for them to take part in an online activity is collected;
Giving parents access or the option to ask for access to personal information we’ve collected from their child – parents can also ask for their children’s personal information to be changed or deleted.
Collecting and using children’s information
While some of our websites, channels and apps are designed with families and users of all ages in mind, others are intended to be used mainly by children. Whenever we collect personal information from a child, we only keep the information for the time we need it to provide a service or for the time it’s legally required to be kept on record.
While children can choose whether to share their information with us, there are features of our websites that won’t function if they haven’t given us their information. Where personal information is needed for features to function, we’ll only ask for information that is reasonably required to take part in the activity.
Here are some examples of times when we collect children’s data:
When children register online.
Children can register on our websites to access a variety of services including content, games and competitions. During registration, we may ask a child to provide their parent’s or guardian’s email address, the child’s first name, gender, their birth date, their username and password. We use this information for security and notification reasons. We strongly encourage children to create a username that excludes any personal information.
When children share content they’ve created themselves.
Some of our websites allow children to create or use content themselves. Since only some of these features require personal information from the child, not all activities require consent from a parent or guardian. Whenever an activity could potentially allow a child to share personal information, we’ll ask the parent or guardian for ‘verifiable parental consent’ (which is a higher level of parental consent). Examples of personal data could be stories, free-text fields, drawings that allow text or free-hand entry of information, photographs of the child, sound clips, movie files or any type of content or other persistent identifiers that clearly identifies the child in some way.
When children enter contests and sweepstakes.
If a child wants to enter a competition, we ask for the personal information we need for a child to take part. We usually only ask for the child’s first name (so we can tell the difference between children from the same family) and the email address of a parent or guardian (so we meet legal requirements to notify the responsible adult). We’ll only contact the parent if the child wins the contest or sweepstake to find out where to send the prize. If the competition asks the child to create content to enter, we may need to ask for parental consent by email in advance to ensure we meet the privacy requirements for content children have created themselves (please see the information above about children creating content). Without consent, children won’t be able to take part in our competitions.
When children receive emails from us.
We may need to ask for a  child’s contact details (including their email address) so that we can reply to a question they’ve asked us. If we need to get in touch with the child a second time, for example to reply to additional questions, we request an email address from their parent or guardian. We then only keep the child’s online contact information for the time it takes us to honor their request and wouldn’t use the information for any other purpose. If we ever need a child’s online contact information for ongoing communication, we ask for the parent’s or guardian’s email address at the earliest opportunity so that we can keep the adult informed of the data we’re collecting and to give the parent an option to ask us to stop collecting data. Parents or guardians can opt out of any communication we have with their child at any time by following the unsubscribe instructions within each communication (if there is more than one type of communication, the adult may need to opt out of each individually). Alternatively, they can contact our LEGO Customer Service team.
When children receive app push notifications.
Many apps send users ‘push notifications’ to their customers’ mobile phones or devices to tell them about updates (sometimes even when the app is not in use). Some of our apps are designed to be used by children. We ask children to provide the email address of their parent or guardian, so we can tell the adult about their child’s request before we send children push notifications from our apps. We don’t link the device identifier with any other personal information without parental consent. If you would like your child to stop receiving push notifications from one of apps, you can change the settings on the device your child’s using at any time.
When we collect location information.
Some of our websites, channels and apps are designed for children. We request consent from a parent or guardian by email before collecting information on a child’s street name, address or coordinates. We do that because such information will effectively make us able to identify a specific child. As an opposite, we don’t require parental consent to collect information on a child’s city, country or region as long as it isn’t linked directly to the specific child. The reason for this, is that such generic information will not make us able to identify a specific child. If you would like to stop us collecting this type of location information, you can adjust the settings on the device your child is using at any time. Alternatively, please contact our LEGO Customer Service team.
When we collect ‘persistent identifiers’.
In order to give visitors to our online channels more relevant and personalized online experiences, we collect some types on information (e.g. information on IP addresses, mobile device identifier, browsers, internet service providers, referring pages, exit pages, visitor frequency, operating systems, date stamps, time stamps and clickstream data). We collect this information using technologies such as cookies, pixels, flash cookies, web beacons and other unique identifiers (which we define under the Cookie section of this Privacy Policy). We may collect this information ourselves or ask a third party to process the data on our behalf. We use this data to give children access to online features and activities, to customize content, to improve our online channels, to analyze the performance of our online channel and to create anonymous reports. If we ever want to collect children’s personal data for any reason, we would contact the child’s parent or guardian for consent in advance. A list of third-party operators who collect ‘persistent identifiers’ on our sites and apps can be found in our
Cookie Policy
and
Cookie Declaration
.
Requesting parental consent
We use different types of parental consent depending on what type of children’s data we are processing and for what purpose.
Asking for parental consent by email
If we need to collect a child’s personal information to provide a service requested by the child, we’ll ask for parental consent according to legal requirements (e.g. COPPA for the US and GDPR for EU). We’ll send the child’s parent or guardian an email explaining what information we’re collecting, how we plan to use it and ask the parent to give or deny their consent. If we don’t receive parental consent in a reasonable time, we’ll delete all information we’ve collected from the child including the adult’s contact information that we asked for in order to request consent.
Asking for ‘verified parental consent’
If a child wants to share personal information publicly or with a third party via one of our websites or digital experiences, we’ll seek a higher level of parental consent than the email request described above. We may ask for verification by credit card or other payment method (with a nominal charge involved), or a review of the parent’s government issued ID.
What if a parent or guardian hasn’t been contacted for consent?
If a child under the age of 16 accesses an online channel that’s designed for children by using an age gate, we’ll email the child’s parent or guardian before collecting any personal information from the child. If you think that your child is taking part in an online activity that collects their personal information and you or another parent/guardian hasn’t received an email contacting you for consent, please
contact us
. We won’t use email addresses provided for parental consent for any other purpose unless the adult has expressly opted-in to marketing emails or taken part in an activity which allows email contact.
Parental choices and controls
At any time, parents or guardians can refuse to allow us to use and collect further personal information from their child. Parents or guardians can ask us to delete the personal information we have collected in connection with their child’s account from our records. As personal information is required for some services, deleting a child’s records may result in an account, membership, or service being unavailable to the child in the future.
If a child has a registered LEGO Account, parents or guardians can access, change or delete the personal information we’ve collected from their child by:
Using their child’s username and password to log into their child’s LEGO Account; or
Getting in touch with our LEGO Customer Service team
If you’d prefer to
contact us
please let us know your child’s username along with your own telephone number and email address. We’ll need to confirm your identity as the parent or guardian of the child before granting access to the child’s personal information. We will respond to your request within a reasonable timeframe.
SECTION 5: INFORMATION FOR KIDS
Information for kids: Child Friendly Privacy Information
Who are we?
We are the LEGO Group and we want to inspire and develop the builders of tomorrow.  We make lots of products like LEGO® bricks and sets, as well as digital apps and games.  We also operate retail stores around the world and on the internet, and we operate the LEGO.com website.
This Privacy Policy tells you how we use your personal data, so you know what happens with it when you give it to us.
Sometimes there are links to other pages.  You might want an adult to help with these because they can sometimes be confusing.
Personal data?  What’s that?
Anything that can be used to identify you is your personal data.  You might already know this could be things like your name or a photo of you, but it is also things like your email address or online username.
The LEGO Group uses a lot of personal data.  If you want to know more, please ask an adult to help you read the entire Privacy Policy.
Why do you need my personal data?
The main reason we need to use your personal data is to know who you are.
If you are logged in to one of our apps or games, we use your personal data to keep track of your game progress, to help you stay connected with your friends in the app or game, or to let you save content you have uploaded to your LEGO Account.
We sometimes also use your personal data because of an event you take part in, or a competition we organize, to make sure if you win that you get your prize.
If we don’t have your personal data, it means we might not be able to do certain things for you.  We might not be able to remember how far you made it in a certain game, or let you upload photos to share with friends.
If you want to know more about what we are doing with your personal data, you can ask an adult to read the full Privacy Policy with you to help you understand the details.
So, can you just use my personal data for anything?
Nope!  We can only use your personal data for certain reasons.
We provide a lot of online services, and there are some rules that say we need to use your personal data to do our work and deliver the service to you, and we can do this without asking you first.
Other times, we need to get consent from your parents. If you or your parents (or guardians) say no then we won’t (and can’t) use your personal data.
Can anyone else see my personal data?
Sometimes we need to share your personal data to do our work. We’re very careful about how we do this, which means there are even more rules.
We might need to share your data with your family if they are helping you. Also, we might need to share your data with other people. Please ask an adult to help you read our full Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy and Cookie Declaration.
Do you keep my personal data forever?
We are only allowed to keep your personal data for as long as we need it. Depending on the circumstances, this period can vary.
Do I have a say in what happens to my personal data?
Yes you do. You have what we call 'rights' when we use your data. One of these is the right to know what we do with it. That’s what this page is for.
You can ask us to tell you what personal data we have about you, or you can tell us to stop using it or delete it. If your personal data is wrong or incorrect, you can tell us and we will fix it.
The rights you have depend on what we use your data for, and there is a lot more information in this Privacy Policy. Please ask an adult to help you read it.
Who makes sure you follow all the rules?
We have someone here at the LEGO Group called our Data Protection Officer, and their job is to protect your data. This means they make sure we are following all the rules, and that your data is safe. If they see something wrong, they tell us how we can fix it.
It is very important for us to keep your data safe, and to follow all the rules.  If you are worried about what we do with your personal data, please
contact us
.
There is also a government agency whose job it is to make sure companies like us follow the rules, and correct us if we do things wrong. You can also email or write to them. You will find their contact information at www.datatilsynet.dk.
About our website
Like lots of websites, our website downloads tiny files called “cookies” onto your computer.  These help our website to work properly for you.  You can find out more about cookies in our Captain Safety video,
here.
LEGO BrickLink, Inc. Privacy Policy
Sub-policy 2
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/:
GPC signal not detected.
Please
download a browser/extension
that supports it.
Take control of your privacy.
Online privacy should be accessible to everyone. It starts with a simpler way to exercise your rights.
Get Started
Get Involved
Read the Latest Press Release
and
Follow @globalprivctrl on Twitter
.
Turn On
GPC
Enable Global Privacy Control to communicate your privacy preference.
Send the Signal
Your browser will send the
GPC
signal to websites you visit.
Exercise Your Rights
Participating websites can respect your privacy rights accordingly.
You may have noticed “Do Not Sell” and “Object To Processing” links around the web from companies complying with privacy regulations. To opt out of websites selling or sharing your personal information, you need to click these links for every site you visit.
Now you can exercise your legal privacy rights in one step via Global Privacy Control (
GPC
), required under the California Consumer Protection Act (CCPA).
Together, over a dozen organizations are developing the
GPC
specification.
Get Involved
GPC
lets users signal their desired privacy, just by browsing.
GPC
is available as part of several major browsers, extensions, and websites.
View Full Spec
Test against the reference server
The
GPC
signal will be intended to communicate a Do Not Sell request from a global privacy control, as per
CCPA-REGULATIONS §999.315
for that browser or device, or, if known, the consumer. Under the GDPR, the intent of the
GPC
signal is to convey a general request that data controllers limit the sale or sharing of the user’s personal data to other data controllers (
GDPR Articles 7 & 21
). Over time, the
GPC
signal may be intended to communicate rights in other jurisdictions.
“
CA DOJ is encouraged to see the technology community developing a global privacy control in furtherance of the CCPA and consumer privacy rights.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
“
40 million consumers are now using web browsers and other privacy tools that support this global opt out. Major publishers, the New York Times, Washington Post, have already pledged to respect it. California's Attorney General has already said that companies must respect GPC. This is a big step in Americans privacy, a big, big step forward.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
My hope is that Governor Northam and the legislature will improve [the newly passed Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act] in the near future in important ways... making it easier for Virginia citizens to invoke their privacy rights, such as through a global privacy control.
”
Mark R. Warner
VA Senator
“
GPC provides a clear and binary indication of an individual's choice... Based on a review of several of the web browsers' intentions regarding GPC, it appears likely to be a prominent, easily understandable, and accessible mechanism in the browser settings.
”
Alexander McD White
Bermuda Privacy Commissioner
“
It's past time to give consumers a real and enforceable way to stop companies from tracking and selling their data. My Mind Your Own Business Act would do just that, and this project [Global Privacy Control] shows it’s possible.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
CCPA requires businesses to treat a user-enabled global privacy control as a legally valid consumer request to opt out of the sale of their data. CCPA opened the door to developing a technical standard, like the GPC, which satisfies this legal requirement & protects privacy.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
Got to slide
0
Got to slide
1
Got to slide
2
Got to slide
3
Got to slide
4
Got to slide
5
Join over 50 million users.
Download a supported browser or extension and start exercising your privacy rights with GPC.
View All Downloads
Abine DeleteMe
LEARN MORE
about
Abine DeleteMe
Brave Browser
LEARN MORE
about
Brave Browser
Disconnect
LEARN MORE
about
Disconnect
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
LEARN MORE
about
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
Firefox
LEARN MORE
about
Firefox
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
LEARN MORE
about
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
Privacy Badger by EFF
LEARN MORE
about
Privacy Badger by EFF
lockrMail by lockr
LEARN MORE
about
lockrMail by lockr
Founding Organizations
The following organizations, representing 50 million users and hundreds of thousands of websites, are in support of GPC.
View All Organizations
Featured Press & Announcements
GPC Privacy Browser Signal Now Used by Millions and Honored By Major Publishers
Global Privacy Control
Your browser can tell websites how to treat your data. But companies didn’t have to listen — until now
The Washington Post
‘Do Not Track’ Is Back, and This Time It Might Work
Wired
Tech-publisher coalition backs new push for browser-level privacy controls
TechCrunch
View More Press
Frequently Asked Questions
Global Privacy Control (GPC) is a proposed specification designed to allow
Internet users to notify businesses of their privacy preferences, such as
whether or not they want their personal information to be sold or shared. It
consists of a setting or extension in the user’s browser or mobile device and
acts as a mechanism that websites can use to indicate they support the
specification.
GPC is being developed by a broad coalition of stakeholders:
technologists, web publishers, technology companies,
browser vendors, extension developers, academics, and
civil rights organizations.
The GPC was initially spearheaded by
Ashkan
Soltani
Georgetown
Law
and
Sebastian
Zimmeck
(
Wesleyan
University
) in collaboration with
The New York
Times
,
The Washington
Post
,
Financial Times
,
Automattic (Wordpress.com & Tumblr)
,
Glitch
,
DuckDuckGo
,
Brave
,
Mozilla
,
Disconnect
,
Abine
,
Digital Content Next (DCN)
,
Consumer
Reports
, and the
Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF)
.
GPC is available for an increasing number of browsers and browser extensions,
listed
here
. If you want to use
GPC, you can download and enable it via a participating browser or browser
extension. More information about downloading GPC is available
here
.
The GPC spec is easy to implement on a wide variety of websites and other
services. The proposed specification and back-end implementation reference
documentation are available
here
.
For additional information, please feel free to reach out on Github or Twitter
(
@globablprivctrl
).
As it is intended to invoke users’ privacy rights, we encourage policymakers
from around the world to engage in the development of this specification. If you
would like to learn more about how GPC could work in your jurisdiction, please
contact us via email at
info[at]globalprivacycontrol.org
.
GPC was initially introduced at the World Wide Web Consortium (W3C)
Privacy
Community Group
(Privacy CG) in April 2020. A
number of stakeholders are part of that community. There are ongoing
discussions in the Privacy CG. Interested parties are encouraged to engage with
the proposal
here
.
Additionally, GPC is currently being implemented across the web. A number of
browsers, extensions, and publishers are supporting or implementing GPC (see
below).
View All
FAQ
s
Get Involved
Contact us to learn more about supporting
GPC
in your browser, app, or website.
@globalprivctrl